Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 3
REHABILITATION ACT OF 1945

Law reviews:

For article, "Forever is an Awfully Long Time: Affordable Housing

C

ovenants in

C

olorado (Part II)", see 48 Colo. Law. 44 (Aug.-Sept. 2019).

29-4-301. Short title.

This part 3 shall be known and may be cited as the "Rehabilitation Act of 1945".

Source:

L. 45:

p. 617, § 2.

CSA:

C. 82, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-2.

29-4-302. Legislative declaration.

It is determined and declared that there exist within the state of Colorado substandard and unsanitary areas, occasioned by inadequate planning, excessive land coverage, lack of proper light, air, and open space, defective design and arrangement of buildings, lack of proper sanitary facilities, and the existence of buildings, which, by reason of age, obsolescence, or physical deterioration, have become economic and social liabilities; that such conditions are conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime; and that such conditions impair the economic value of wide areas, infecting them with economic blight which results in inability to pay reasonable taxes. It is hereby declared that the remedying of such conditions is in the public interest, and this part 3 is enacted to provide means whereby said areas may be redeveloped by private enterprise with such assistance from public funds as may be furnished in accordance with the provisions of this part 3.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 617, § 1.

CSA:

C. 82, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-1.

29-4-303. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Area" means that portion of a municipality for which a plan of rehabilitation is adopted by the city council of a municipality as set out in this part 3.

"Authority" means the agency created by ordinance of the city council of a municipality to carry out the development plan adopted for the area.

"City attorney" means the official designated by the general laws of Colorado or by the charter of a municipality to be responsible for the handling of its legal affairs.

"City auditor" means the official of a municipality who has charge of auditing the financial affairs of a municipality.

"City council" means the city council of a city or the board of trustees of an incorporated town or the legislative body of a municipality, by whatever name said legislative body is designated by statute or by city charter.

"City treasurer" means the official who is the custodian of the funds of a municipality.

"Development plan" means the plan adopted by the city council of a municipality for the development of an area.

"Mortgage" means any mortgage, deed of trust, pledge, or other instrument in writing by which any property, the proceeds thereof, or the income therefrom is made security for the repayment of any advance or loan of money as set out in this part 3.

"Municipality" means any incorporated town or city of the state of Colorado whether organized under general laws or under special charter.

"Planning commission" means the board or commission of the municipality whose duty it is under the statutes, charter, or ordinances to make plans for the growth and development of the municipality or to advise the executive officers of the municipality in the matter of planning.

"Public grounds" of an area means those portions of the area set aside, as provided in this part 3, for streets, alleys, parks, playgrounds, and other public uses.

"Reconstruction agency" means any corporation, copartnership, or person contracting to carry out in whole or in part the rebuilding under a development plan for an area.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 618, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-3.

29-4-304. Preparation of development plan.

The planning commission of a municipality either on its own initiative or at the request of the city council of a municipality may prepare a suggested plan for the rehabilitation of any substandard or unsanitary area as defined in section 29-4-302.

The preparation of the suggested plan shall include but shall not be limited to:

Making a survey of the locality under consideration to determine its needs;

Making a preliminary determination of the lands to be included in the proposed area;

Making a suggested plan for the development of the proposed area;

Preparing estimates of the cost of the acquisition of the land in the proposed area, of demolishing the structures thereon, and of doing the necessary improvement of the public grounds to be included therein;

Making the necessary plans for the financing of the proposed enterprise, including contacting and negotiating with agencies which might be interested in the financing thereof; and

The preparation of a report to the city council of the municipality on the proposed area.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 619, § 4.

CSA:

C. 82, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-4.

29-4-305. Assistance in preparation of plan.

In the preparation of a suggested development plan for a proposed area, the planning commission is authorized to accept assistance from governmental and private agencies but has no power to provide for the repayment of such assistance unless expressly authorized to do so by ordinance of the city council of the municipality.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 619, § 5.

CSA:

C. 82, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-5.

29-4-306. Action on setting up of authority.

When the planning commission has completed its report on a suggested development plan for a proposed area and has presented the same to the city council of a municipality, such city council, if it deems the suggested plan desirable in whole or in part, by ordinance, may proceed to take the following steps, but the enumeration of such steps shall not be exclusive and shall not prevent the city council from taking the following steps:

Define the area by adopting in whole or in part or modifying the area outlined in the suggested plan;

Adopt the suggested plan, with such modifications as the city council determines, and make it the development plan for the area;

Set up an authority for the area and provide for the number of persons who shall constitute the authority and for the method of appointment and term thereof, including the filling of vacancies. The members of the authority may be either regular officials of the municipality or private persons; and in the case of private persons, the city council shall fix the compensation, if any, they are to receive.

Give the authority a name which shall include the words "rehabilitation authority" with some other word or words descriptive of the area (that is, each authority shall be designated the ".............. Rehabilitation Authority"), filling in the blank space by the appropriate designation.

Any such authority has the power, in the name of the municipality, to institute and defend all litigation affecting its powers and duties or in relation to the area and the property and rights connected therewith or incidental thereto and also has and may exercise the power of eminent domain on behalf of the municipality in the acquisition of real property in the area.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 619, § 6.

CSA:

C. 82, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-6.

29-4-307. Additional powers of authority.

In addition to the powers contained in section 29-4-306, the city council of a municipality may, by ordinance, give the authority of an area any or all of the additional powers set out in this section; and the enumeration of the following powers shall not be taken as a denial of the right of the city council to give the authority such other powers as the city council may determine to be expedient in order to enable the authority to carry out the purposes set out in section 29-4-302 and outlined in the development plan for the area:

The power to acquire, in the name of the municipality, the land in the area by purchase, gift, condemnation, or otherwise;

The power to designate and set aside such part or parts of the area as may be necessary or desirable for public grounds;

The power to vacate existing plats of the area or parts thereof and to replat the same and, with the aid of the proper municipal officials, to lay out, open, change, and establish streets, alleys, parks, playgrounds, or other public grounds;

The power to remove or cause to be removed some or all of the existing structures in the area so as to permit reconstruction and the power to construct or arrange for the construction of public improvements on the public grounds of the area;

The power to secure the necessary funds for the acquisition of the land in the area, the demolition of the existing structures, and the improvement of the public grounds; and for these purposes to borrow money, receive grants, and obtain financial assistance by such other means or methods as may be provided in the development plan for the area;

The power to issue bonds or debentures in payment of moneys borrowed. Such bonds or debentures may be issued either with or without general municipal liability, but general liability bonds may only be issued after being authorized in the manner provided by the general laws of Colorado or by the charter of the municipality. A mortgage may be given on the property in an area, except the public grounds, and the proceeds thereof and the rents therefrom to secure the debentures.

The power and the duty promptly to sell or give long-term leases on all or any part of the property in the area except the public grounds to a reconstruction agency, with the obligation upon the reconstruction agency to improve the property in accordance with the development plan of the area. All deeds or leases shall be executed in the name of the municipality, at the request of the authority, by the officers of the authority, unless some other method of execution is prescribed by the general laws of Colorado or by the charter of the municipality. The authorities shall not have power to construct improvements upon the said property other than public grounds and public buildings thereon, if any.

The power to make such contracts, in the name of the municipality, as may be incidental to the execution of the other powers conferred upon the authority;

The power to initiate and prosecute proceedings, under the general laws of Colorado or under the charter of the municipality, for the assessment of part of the cost of the land in the area to other property specially benefited by the rehabilitation of the area; and

The power to deposit moneys of the authority not then needed in the conduct of its affairs in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the authority may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the authority. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the authority requires.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 620, § 7.

CSA:

C. 82, 68.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-7.

L. 79:

(1)(j) added, p. 1618, § 16, effective June 8.

29-4-308. Organization of authority.

The authority of an area shall proceed to organize for the performance of the duties for which it is created, and such organization shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following unless otherwise provided by the ordinance creating the authority:

The adoption of bylaws which shall provide that a majority of the members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business;

The election from the members of the authority of a president and vice-president and the appointment of a secretary and, if desirable, an assistant secretary. Neither of the latter need be members of the authority.

The adoption of a seal for the authority.

The city treasurer of the municipality shall be the treasurer of the authority. If the municipality has a city auditor, he shall be the auditor of the authority. Otherwise, the authority may appoint an auditor. The city attorney shall be the attorney for the authority. If the additional work cast upon the city treasurer, city auditor, or city attorney by reason of the affairs of the authority shall be so heavy as to require the employment of additional persons by any of said city officials, the expense of the employment of such additional persons shall be borne by the authority.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 622, § 8.

CSA:

C. 82, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-8.

29-4-309. Condemnation for a superior use.

The purpose of condemnation for the rehabilitation of an area under this part 3 is declared to be for a superior public use, and property already devoted to one public use may be condemned for the purposes of this part 3.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 622, § 9.

CSA:

C. 82, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-9.

29-4-310. Area not wholly in one municipality.

If a substandard or unsanitary area, as described in section 29-4-302, extends into two or more municipalities, such municipalities, by contract between the municipalities, may provide for the redevelopment of the area and for the part of the work to be done by each of the municipalities.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 622, § 10.

CSA:

C. 82, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-10.

29-4-311. Termination of an authority.

The city council, by ordinance, may terminate an authority and provide for its remaining duties to be taken over by some other agency of the municipality.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 623, § 11.

CSA:

C. 82, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-11.

29-4-312. Appropriations by municipality.

The rehabilitation of a substandard or unsanitary area, as defined in section 29-4-302, may be aided by appropriations to be made from time to time by the city council of a municipality from the general revenues of the municipality.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 623, § 12.

CSA:

C. 82, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-12.

29-4-313. Taxation.

Every development plan for an area shall provide that the purchaser of any of the property of the area shall pay taxes thereon as upon any other property and shall also provide that the lessee of any part of the area shall pay taxes on the improvements erected by the lessee on the leased land, and such development plan shall include a requirement that the lessee, in addition, shall pay to the county treasurer annually a sum equal to what would have been the taxes on the land in case of an outright purchase thereof.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 623, § 13.

CSA:

C. 82, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-13.

29-4-314. Supervision of reconstruction agency.

It is the duty of the authority to keep informed as to the performance by any reconstruction agency of its obligations in the rehabilitation work, and the authority, in the name of and on behalf of the municipality, shall take any legal or other steps deemed by it advisable in case the reconstruction agency fails in the performance of its obligations.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 623, § 14.

CSA:

C. 82, § 75.

CRS 53:

§ 69-4-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-4-14.